California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 747, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2654.

For the purpose of this article wages due to any individual but unpaid within the time limit provided by law, shall be deemed wages paid to such individual.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1371.)
-------------------------------------------

2655.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f), an individual’s “weekly benefit amount” shall be the amount appearing in column B in the table set forth in this subdivision on the line of which in column A of the table there appears the wage bracket containing the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which wages were the highest.A
Amount of wages in
highest quarterB
Weekly benefit
amount $75–1,149.99$501,150–1,174.99 511,175–1,199.99 521,200–1,224.99 531,225–1,249.99 541,250–1,274.99 551,275–1,299.99 561,300–1,324.99 571,325–1,349.99 581,350–1,374.99 591,375–1,399.99 601,400–1,424.99 611,425–1,449.99 621,450–1,474.99 631,475–1,499.99 641,500–1,524.99 651,525–1,549.99 661,550–1,574.99 671,575–1,599.99 681,600–1,624.99 691,625–1,649.99 701,650–1,674.99 711,675–1,699.99 721,700–1,724.99 731,725–1,749.20 74(b) For periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 1990, and prior to January 1, 1991, if the amount of wages paid an individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest exceeds one thousand seven hundred forty-nine dollars and twenty cents ($1,749.20), the weekly benefit amount shall be 55 percent of these wages divided by 13, but not exceeding two hundred
 sixty-six dollars ($266) or the maximum workers’ compensation temporary disability indemnity weekly benefit amount, whichever is less. If the benefit payable under this subdivision is not a multiple of one dollar ($1), it shall be computed to the next higher multiple of one dollar ($1).

(c) For periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 1991, but before January 1, 2000, if the amount of wages paid an individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest exceeds one thousand seven hundred forty-nine dollars and twenty cents ($1,749.20), the weekly benefit amount shall be 55 percent of these wages divided by 13, but not exceeding three hundred thirty-six dollars ($336). If the benefit payable under this subdivision is not a multiple of one dollar
 ($1), it shall be computed to the next higher multiple of one dollar ($1).

(d) (1) For periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 2000, but before January 1, 2018, if the amount of wages paid an individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest exceeds one thousand seven hundred forty-nine dollars and twenty cents ($1,749.20), the weekly benefit amount shall be equal to 55 percent of these wages divided by 13, but not exceeding the maximum workers’ compensation temporary disability indemnity weekly benefit amount.

(2) Notwithstanding the maximum workers’ compensation temporary disability indemnity weekly benefit amount of paragraph (1), if the benefit under this
 subdivision is not a multiple of one dollar ($1), it shall be computed to the next higher multiple of one dollar ($1).

(e) For periods of disability commencing on and after January 1, 2018, but before January 1, 2025, an individual’s “weekly benefit amount” shall be as follows:

(1) When the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest is less than nine hundred twenty-nine dollars ($929), then fifty dollars ($50).

(2) When the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest is nine hundred
 twenty-nine dollars ($929) or more, and is less than one-third of the amount of the state average quarterly wage, then 70 percent of the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest, divided by 13. If the weekly benefit amount is not a multiple of one dollar ($1), it shall be computed to the next higher multiple of one dollar ($1).

(3) Except as provided in paragraph (4), when the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest is one-third of the amount of the state average quarterly wage, or more, then either (A) 23.3 percent of the state average weekly wage or (B) 60 percent of the amount of wages paid
 to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest divided by 13, whichever amount is greater. If the weekly benefit amount is not a multiple of one dollar ($1), it shall be computed to the next higher multiple of one dollar ($1).

(4) An individual’s “weekly benefit amount” shall not exceed the maximum workers’ compensation temporary disability
 indemnity weekly benefit amount established by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 4453 of the Labor Code.

(f) (1) For periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 2025, the weekly benefit amount shall be as follows:

(A) When the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest is less than seven hundred twenty-two dollars and fifty cents ($722.50), then fifty dollars ($50).

(B) When the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base
 period in which these wages were highest is more than 70 percent of the state average quarterly wage, the weekly benefit amount shall be equal to the greater of 70 percent of the wages paid to an individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest, divided by 13, but not exceeding the maximum workers’ compensation temporary disability indemnity weekly benefit amount established by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 4453 of the Labor Code, or 63 percent of the state average weekly wage.

(C) When the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest is seven hundred twenty-two dollars and fifty cents
 ($722.50) or more, but
 70 percent or less than the state average quarterly wage, then the weekly benefit amount shall be equal to 90 percent of the wages paid to an individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest, divided by 13, but not exceeding the maximum workers’ compensation temporary disability indemnity weekly benefit amount established by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 4453 of the Labor Code.

(2) Notwithstanding the maximum workers’ compensation temporary disability indemnity weekly benefit amount of paragraph (1), if the benefit under this subdivision is not a multiple of one dollar ($1), it shall be computed to the next higher multiple of one dollar ($1).

(g) For purposes of this section:

(1) “State average quarterly wage” means the state average weekly wage multiplied by 13.

(2) “State average weekly wage” means the average weekly wage paid by employers to employees covered by unemployment insurance as reported by the United States Department of Labor for California for the 12 months ending on March 31 of the calendar year preceding the year in which the disability occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 878, Sec. 2.   (SB 951)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2656.

(a) An individual eligible to receive disability benefits who receives wages or regular wages from his or her employer during the period of his or her disability or period of family care leave shall be paid disability benefits for any seven-day week or partial week in an amount not to exceed his or her maximum weekly amount which together with the wages or regular wages does not exceed his or her weekly wage, exclusive of wages paid for overtime work, immediately prior to the commencement of his or her disability or period of family care
 leave.

(b) For purposes of this section, to determine the wages or regular wages received by the eligible individual, the amount as stated by the individual shall be presumed to be accurate. This presumption is one affecting the burden of producing evidence.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (g) of Section 3303, for purposes of periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 1992, vacation pay is not considered wages for determining eligibility for disability benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 797, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2657.

If the remuneration of an individual is not based upon a fixed period or duration of time or if the individual’s wages are paid at irregular intervals or in such manner as not to extend regularly over the period of employment, the wages for any week or for any calendar quarter for the purpose of computing an individual’s right to disability benefits shall be determined pursuant to authorized regulations. The regulations shall, so far as possible, secure results reasonably similar to those which would prevail if the individual were paid his wages at regular intervals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

2658.

Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions in this part, except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 2611, in determining the benefit rights of any person who was involved in a trade dispute during the disability base period, as determined pursuant to Section 2610, there shall be excluded from the disability base period those quarters during which the person performed no services in employment for 60 days or more as a result of a trade dispute. For all quarters so excluded there shall be substituted an equal number of quarters immediately preceding the commencement of the trade dispute. In the event the disability base period so determined includes
 wages in calendar quarters for which the records have been destroyed under proper approval, a claimant may establish the amount of wages by affidavit in accordance with authorized regulations. The quarter of commencement of the trade dispute shall be counted as a completed quarter if the director finds that the inclusion thereof would be more equitable to the claimant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1211, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Disqualifications [2675. - 2681.]

2675.

(a) An individual shall be disqualified from receiving benefits under this part if he or she has willfully, for the purpose of obtaining benefits, either made a false statement or representation, with actual knowledge of the falsity thereof, or withheld a material fact in order to obtain any benefits under this part. 

(b) An individual disqualified under subdivision (a) under a determination transmitted to him or her by the department, shall be ineligible to receive benefits from the date the disqualifying determination was issued and for not less than seven nor more than 35 subsequent days for which he or she is otherwise eligible for benefits under this part. When successive disqualifications under subdivision (a) occur, the director may extend the period of ineligibility for an additional period not to exceed 56 days. 

(c) If all or any of the assessed days of ineligibility cannot be served because the individual is no longer otherwise eligible for benefits under this part, the assessed days of ineligibility shall be applied to any subsequent disability benefit period for which he or she is otherwise eligible for benefits. No disqualification under this subdivision shall be applied, however, to any day of eligibility which falls beyond the three-year period next succeeding the date upon which the determination was mailed or served by the department. 

(d) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to disqualifying determinations issued on or after January 1, 1992.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1134, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

2676.

An individual who is disqualified from receiving unemployment compensation benefits under Sections 1256, 1257, 1260, 1261, and 1263 shall be presumed to be ineligible to receive disability benefits under this part for the same period or periods unless he or she establishes to the satisfaction of the director that he or she is suffering a bona fide illness or injury or claiming a period of family care leave and the director finds that there is good cause for paying disability benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2677.

An individual who is otherwise eligible for benefits under this part shall not be disqualified from receiving such benefits because of a disqualification from receiving unemployment compensation benefits under Section 1262.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1052.)
-------------------------------------------

2678.

An individual shall be disqualified from receiving benefits under this part while he is confined, pursuant to commitment or court order or certification, in an institution or other place, as a dipsomaniac, drug addict or sexual psychopath.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1805.)
-------------------------------------------

2679.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual who is otherwise eligible shall not be disqualified for benefits under this part for the day on which he or she or a family member, as defined in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3300), for whom the individual is providing care, died.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 797, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2680.

(a) An individual shall be ineligible for benefits under this part for any day during which he or she is incarcerated in any federal, state, or municipal penal institution, jail, medical facility, public or private hospital, or in any other place because of a criminal violation of a federal, state, or other municipal law or ordinance. For purposes of this section, “incarceration” includes any time spent in the custody of law enforcement authorities upon adjudication or conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) This section shall apply only with respect to periods of incarceration commencing on or after January 1, 1994.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 318, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2681.

(a) Any individual who commits a crime shall be ineligible for benefits under this part if the individual is disabled due to an illness or injury caused by, or arising out of the commission of, arrest, investigation, or prosecution of any crime that results in a felony conviction.

(b) For purposes of this section, a plea or verdict of guilty, or a felony conviction following a plea of nolo contendere or no contest shall be considered to be a felony conviction under this part, irrespective of whether an order granting probation or suspending the imposition or execution of any sentence is issued.

(c) This section shall apply only with respect to convictions rendered on or after January 1, 1994, regardless of the date the disability commenced, or benefits were paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 318, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Filing, Determination and Payment of Disability Benefit Claims [2701. - 2714.]

2701.

(a) Disability benefits shall be paid by the department through public employment offices or other agencies approved by the director.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2024, the department shall provide a person entitled to receive disability benefits or family temporary disability insurance benefits under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3300) the option to receive payments by direct deposit, as regulated under the federal Electronic Fund Transfer Act (EFTA) (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1693 et seq.), into a qualifying account, as defined in
 paragraph (3) of subdivision (e),
 of the recipient’s choice, in addition to other alternative disbursement payment methods, including, but not limited to, debit cards and checks.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, if disability benefits or family temporary disability insurance benefits are directly deposited to an account of the recipient’s choice, as authorized under the federal Electronic Fund Transfer Act (EFTA) (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1693 et seq.), the payments shall only be deposited to an account that meets the requirements of a qualifying account, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (e).

(2) A person or entity that is not an insured depository financial institution that offers, maintains, or manages an account that does not comply with paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) shall not
 solicit, accept, or facilitate the direct deposit of disability benefits or family temporary disability insurance benefits to the account.

(d) For purposes of this section, the department shall not be held liable for authorizing a direct deposit of disability benefits or family temporary disability insurance benefits into an account designated by the recipient that does not comply with paragraph (3) of subdivision (e). The department has no obligation to determine whether an account at the insured depository financial institution of the recipient’s choice is a qualifying account, as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (e).

(e) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Insured depository financial institution” means a state or national bank, a state or federal savings and loan
 association, a mutual savings bank, or a state or federal credit union that holds deposits insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the National Credit Union Administration.

(2) “Prepaid account” has the same meaning as that term is defined in regulations under the EFTA.

(3) “Qualifying account” is one of the following:

(A) A demand deposit or savings account at an insured depository financial institution that is offered directly by the insured depository financial institution on its internet website or through its branches and that is in the name of the person entitled to the receipt of disability benefits or family temporary disability insurance benefits.

(B) A prepaid account, or a demand deposit or savings account offered by, or
 through, an entity other than an insured depository financial institution, that meets all of the following:

(i) The account is held at an insured depository financial institution.

(ii) The account is set up to meet the requirements for direct or passthrough deposit or share insurance payable to the person entitled to the receipt of disability benefits or family temporary disability insurance benefits by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation in accordance with Part 330 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or the National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund in accordance with Part 745 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(iii) The account is not attached to a credit or overdraft feature that is automatically repaid from the account unless the credit or overdraft feature has no fee, charge, or
 cost, whether direct, required, voluntary, or involuntary, or the credit or overdraft feature complies with the requirements for credit offered in connection with a prepaid account under the federal Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.) and its implementing regulations.

(iv) The account complies with all of the requirements, and provides the holder of the account with all of the consumer protections, that apply to an account under the rules implementing the EFTA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 546, Sec. 3.   (SB 497)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.5.

(a) The department shall issue the initial payment for unemployment compensation disability benefits to a monetarily eligible claimant who is otherwise determined eligible by the department under applicable law and regulation within 14 days of receipt of the claimant’s properly completed first disability claim.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until Section 2701.5.5 is incorporated in the Employment Development Department’s integrated claims management system as part of the EDDNext project, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 876, Sec. 1.   (SB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative by its own provisions.    Repealed conditionally by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.5.5.

(a) The department shall issue the initial payment for unemployment compensation disability benefits to a monetarily eligible claimant who is otherwise determined eligible by the department under applicable law and regulation within 14 days of receipt of the claimant’s properly completed first disability claim or as soon as eligibility begins for the claimant, whichever is later.

(b) This section shall become operative when
 incorporated in the Employment Development Department’s integrated claims management system as part of the EDDNext project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 876, Sec. 2.   (SB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2702.

Minors who are eligible for disability benefits may be paid and receive such benefits in their own right and a receipt signed by a minor shall be valid and binding in all respects.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

2703.

The establishment of a disability benefit period for unemployment compensation disability benefits shall not establish a benefit year for unemployment compensation benefits and the filing of a valid claim for one shall not establish a valid claim for the other. Wages used to establish a valid claim for disability benefits may be used to establish a subsequent claim for disability benefits or unemployment compensation benefits provided such wages were paid in the base period applicable to the subsequent claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1371.)
-------------------------------------------

2705.

Where an individual who would be eligible to receive disability benefits dies before making a claim therefor, the director may in accordance with authorized regulations allow the filing of a claim for such benefits by a person legally entitled thereto under Section 1341.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

2705.1.

Where an individual who would be eligible to receive disability benefits is mentally unable to make a claim therefor, the director shall, in accordance with authorized regulations, allow the filing of a claim for these benefits by the spouse or domestic partner of the individual, in the absence of any other legally authorized representative of the individual. A payment shall be made upon affidavit executed by the spouse or domestic partner or person or persons claiming to be entitled to the benefits and the receipt of the affidavit or affidavits shall fully discharge the Director of Employment Development from any further liability with reference to the payments, without the necessity of inquiring into the truth of any of the facts stated in the affidavit.

For the purposes of this section “mentally unable to make a claim” shall be limited to those cases in which the individual is certified by a healing arts practitioner specified in Sections 2708 and 2709 to be mentally unable to make a claim pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2706.

Claims for disability benefits shall be made in accordance with authorized regulations of the Director of Employment Development. Each employer shall post and maintain in places readily accessible to individuals in his service printed statements concerning such regulations and shall make available to each such individual copies of such printed statements, regulations or matters relating to claims for disability benefits as the Director of Employment Development may prescribe. Such printed statements shall be supplied to each employer by the Director of Employment Development without cost to the employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1212, Sec. 215.)
-------------------------------------------

2706.1.

(a) A first claim, accompanied by a certificate on a form furnished by the department to the claimant, shall be filed not later than the 41st consecutive day following the first compensable day of unemployment and disability with respect to which the claim is made for benefits, which time shall be extended by the department upon a showing of good cause. If a first claim is not complete, the claim form shall be returned to the claimant for completion and it shall be completed and returned not later than the 10th consecutive day after the date it was mailed by the department to the claimant, except that such time shall be extended by the department upon a showing of good cause.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until Section 2706.1.5 is incorporated in the Employment Development Department’s integrated claims management system as part of the EDDNext project, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 876, Sec. 3.   (SB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative by its own provisions.    Repealed conditionally by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2706.1.5.

(a) A claimant may initiate the claim process up to 30 days in advance of the anticipated first compensable day. A first claim, accompanied by a certificate on a form furnished by the department to the claimant, shall be filed not later than the 41st consecutive day
 following the first compensable day of unemployment and disability with respect to which the claim is made for benefits, which time shall be extended by the department upon a showing of good cause. If a first claim is not complete, the claim form shall be returned to the claimant for completion and it shall be completed and returned not later than the 10th consecutive day after the date it was mailed by the department to the claimant, except that the time shall be extended by the department upon a showing of good cause.

(b) This section shall become operative when incorporated in the Employment
 Development Department’s integrated claims management system as part of the EDDNext project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 876, Sec. 4.   (SB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2706.2.

Any continued medical certification shall be submitted to the department within 20 days of the date the claimant is issued a notice of final payment or departmental request for additional medical certification. The 20-day time limit shall be extended by the department upon a showing of good cause.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1134, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2707.

The department shall give a notice of the filing of a first claim for each disability benefit period to the employing unit by which the claimant was last employed immediately preceding the filing of such claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

2707.1.

Within two working days after receipt of the notice provided for in Section 2707, or if there has been a termination of the claimant’s service within five days after such termination, whichever is the later, the last employer shall notify the department of any information known to him which may bear upon the eligibility of the claimant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

2707.2.

(a) The department shall consider the facts submitted by the employer pursuant to Section 2707.1 and make a determination as to the eligibility of the claimant for benefits. The department shall promptly notify the claimant of the determination and the reasons therefor. The claimant may appeal therefrom to an administrative law judge within 30 days from service of the notice of determination. The 30-day period may be extended for good cause. The director shall be an interested party to any appeal.

(b) “Good cause,” as used in this section, shall include, but not be limited to, mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect.

(c) This section shall become operative on March 1, 2018.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 29.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2707.3.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this section, upon the filing of a claim for unemployment compensation disability benefits, the Employment Development Department shall promptly make a computation on the claim which shall set forth the maximum amount of benefits potentially payable during the disability benefit period and the weekly benefit amount. The Employment Development Department shall promptly notify the claimant of the computation.

(b) No computation shall be made on a claim of an employee for disability benefits under an approved self-insured plan if the uninterrupted period of disability for such claim does not exceed the waiting period prescribed for benefits from the Disability Fund under subdivision (b) of Section 2627.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1143.)
-------------------------------------------

2707.4.

(a) The claimant may, within 30 days after the service of the notice of computation or recomputation, protest the accuracy of the computation or recomputation. The 30-day period may be extended for good cause. The department shall consider any such protest and shall promptly notify the claimant of the recomputation or denial of recomputation. The claimant may appeal from a notice of denial of recomputation in the manner prescribed in Section 2707.2. The director shall be an interested party to any appeal.

(b) “Good cause,” as used in this section, shall include, but not be limited to, mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect.

(c) This section shall become operative on March 1, 2018.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 30.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2707.5.

(a) The department may for good cause reconsider any determination provided for in this part prior to the filing of an appeal therefrom, or within 30 days after an appeal to an administrative law judge is filed. The department shall promptly notify the claimant of any reconsidered determination, and the claimant may appeal therefrom in the manner prescribed in Section 2707.2. The director shall be an interested party to any appeal.

(b) The department may for good cause reconsider any computation or recomputation provided for in this part within one year from the beginning date of the disability benefit period to which the notice of computation or recomputation relates, except that no recomputation may be considered with respect to any issue considered or under consideration in an appeal taken from a denial of recomputation. The department shall promptly notify the claimant of the recomputation. The claimant may protest the accuracy of the recomputation as prescribed in Section 2707.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 797, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2707.6.

Notices, protests, and information required under this article shall be submitted in accordance with authorized regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1159.)
-------------------------------------------

2707.8.

(a) An administrative law judge, after affording a reasonable opportunity for fair hearing, shall, unless the appeal is withdrawn, affirm, reverse, modify, or set aside any determination that is appealed under this article. The claimant and the director shall be promptly notified in writing of the administrative law judge’s decision, together with reasons for the decision. The decision shall be final unless, within 30 days after mailing of the decision, further appeal is initiated to the appeals board pursuant to Section 1336. The 30-day limitation may be extended for good cause.

(b) “Good cause,” as used in this section, shall include, but not be limited to, mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable
 neglect.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 276, Sec. 6.   (AB 2886)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2708.

(a) (1) In accordance with the director’s authorized regulations, and except as provided in subdivision (c) and Sections 2708.1 and 2709, a claimant shall establish medical eligibility for each uninterrupted period of disability by filing a first claim for disability benefits supported by the certificate of a treating physician or practitioner that establishes the sickness, injury, or pregnancy of the employee, or the condition of the family member that warrants the care of the employee. For subsequent periods of uninterrupted disability after the period covered by the initial certificate or any preceding continued claim, a claimant shall file a continued claim for those benefits supported by the certificate of a treating
 physician or practitioner. A certificate filed to establish medical eligibility for the employee’s own sickness, injury, or pregnancy shall contain a diagnosis and diagnostic code prescribed in the International Classification of Diseases, or, if no diagnosis has yet been obtained, a detailed statement of symptoms.

(2) A certificate filed to establish medical eligibility of the employee’s own sickness, injury, or pregnancy shall also contain a statement of medical facts, including secondary diagnoses when applicable, within the physician’s or practitioner’s knowledge, based on a physical examination and a documented medical history of the claimant by the physician or practitioner, indicating the physician’s or practitioner’s conclusion as to the claimant’s disability, and a statement of the physician’s or practitioner’s opinion as to the
 expected duration of the disability.

(b) An employee shall be required to file a certificate to establish eligibility when taking leave to care for a family member with a serious health condition. The certificate shall be developed by the department. In order to establish medical eligibility of the serious health condition of the family member that warrants the care of the employee, the information shall be within the physician’s or practitioner’s knowledge and shall be based on a physical examination and documented medical history of the family member and shall contain all of the following:

(1) A diagnosis and diagnostic code prescribed in the International Classification of Diseases, or, if no diagnosis has yet been obtained, a detailed statement of symptoms.

(2) The date, if known, on which the condition commenced.

(3) The probable duration of the condition.

(4) An estimate of the amount of time that the physician or practitioner believes the employee needs to care for the child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, spouse, or domestic partner.

(5) (A) A statement that the serious health condition warrants the participation of the employee to provide care for their child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, spouse, or domestic partner.

(B) “Warrants the participation of the employee” includes, but is not limited to,
 providing psychological comfort, and arranging “third party” care for the child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, spouse, or domestic partner, as well as directly providing, or participating in, the medical care.

(c) The department shall develop a certification form for bonding that is separate and distinct from the certificate required in subdivision (a) for an employee taking leave to bond with a minor child within the first year of the child’s birth or placement in connection with foster care or adoption.

(d) The first and any continuing claim of an individual who obtains care and treatment outside this state shall be supported by a certificate of a treating physician or practitioner duly licensed or certified by the state or foreign country in which the claimant is
 receiving the care and treatment. If a physician or practitioner licensed by and practicing in a foreign country is under investigation by the department for filing false claims and the department does not have legal remedies to conduct a criminal investigation or prosecution in that country, the department may suspend the processing of all further certifications until the physician or practitioner fully cooperates, and continues to cooperate, with the investigation. A physician or practitioner licensed by, and practicing in, a foreign country who has been convicted of filing false claims with the department may not file a certificate in support of a claim for disability benefits for a period of five years.

(e) For purposes of this part:

(1) “Physician” has the same meaning as
 defined in Section 3209.3 of the Labor Code.

(2) (A) “Practitioner” means a person duly licensed or certified in California acting within the scope of their license or certification who is a dentist, podiatrist, or a nurse practitioner, and in the case of a nurse practitioner, after performance of a physical examination by a nurse practitioner and collaboration with a physician and surgeon, or as to pregnancy, childbirth, or postpartum conditions consistent with the scope of their professional licensure, a midwife or nurse-midwife, or nurse practitioner.

(B) “Practitioner” also means a physician assistant who has performed a physical examination under the supervision of a physician and surgeon. Funds appropriated to cover the costs required to
 implement this subparagraph shall come from the Unemployment Compensation Disability Fund. This subparagraph shall be implemented on or before January 1, 2017.

(f) For a claimant who is hospitalized in or under the authority of a county hospital in this state, a certificate of initial and continuing medical disability, if any, shall satisfy the requirements of this section if the disability is shown by the claimant’s hospital chart, and the certificate is signed by the hospital’s registrar. For a claimant hospitalized in or under the care of a medical facility of the United States government, a certificate of initial and continuing medical disability, if any, shall satisfy the requirements of this section if the disability is shown by the claimant’s hospital chart, and the certificate is signed by a medical officer of the facility duly
 authorized to do so.
